Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2320
County funds; depositories; security
in lieu of bond.

In lieu of a bond as provided in sections
77-2316 to 77-2319, any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying
mutual financial institution making application to become a depository under
sections 77-2312 to 77-2324 may give security as provided in the Public Funds
Deposit Security Act to the county treasurer. Section 77-2366
shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01
shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1909, c. 35, § 1, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 6662;

C.S.1922, § 6193;

Laws 1925, c. 96, § 1, p. 279;

Laws 1927, c. 34, § 2, p. 156;

Laws 1929, c. 36, § 1, p. 151;

C.S.1929, § 77-2508;

Laws 1935, c. 152, § 4, p. 563;

Laws 1939, c. 103, § 3, p. 464;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2508;

R.S.1943, § 77-2320;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 15, p. 945;

Laws 1977, LB 266, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 703, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 39;

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 32;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 41;

Laws 2012, LB879, § 1.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.

Banks designated as depositories may pledge assets of bank to secure state and county funds when deposited therein. Bliss v. Pathfinder Irr. Dist., 122 Neb. 203, 240 N.W. 291 (1932).

Specification of certain assets which bank may pledge to secure repayment of county deposits is not a limitation on power to pledge others. Bliss v. Mason, 121 Neb. 484, 237 N.W. 581 (1931).